Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. The Legislature hereby finds:
1. Academic growth is a critical indicator of instructional
effectiveness;
2. Oklahoma's teacher compensation system does not fully align
pay with demonstrable growth in student learning;
3. Research indicates that performance-based compensation tied
to academic growth can improve student achievement and teacher
retention when implemented with fidelity; and
4. Targeted pilot programs allow the State to rigorously
evaluate effectiveness.
B. The purpose of this act shall be to establish a pilot
program that provides growth-based compensation for teachers in
grades fourth through eighth and extends schoolwide incentives to
early-grade teachers to encourage vertical alignment of instruction.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-213 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
Req. No. 16075 Page 2

1. "Eligible teacher" means a full-time certified teacher
teaching grades fourth through eighth in English language arts and
mathematics at a participating school;
2. "Student academic growth" means annual student progress as
measured by the Oklahoma State Testing Program;
3. "Recognized teacher" means an eligible teacher whose
students demonstrate student academic growth at or above an
established growth threshold;
4. "Participating school" means a public or charter elementary
or middle school serving grades fourth through eighth; and
5. "Early-grade teachers" means a full-time certified teacher
teaching pre-kindergarten through second grade at a participating
school.
B. There is hereby established a Growth-Based Teacher
Compensation Program to be administered by the Office of Educational
Quality and Accountability. Beginning with the 2026–2027 school
year, the pilot program shall operate for a minimum of four (4)
consecutive school years.
C. To be eligible to earn individual growth-based compensation
under this section, teachers shall be full-time certified teachers
teaching grades fourth through eighth in English language arts and
mathematics at a participating school. The pilot program shall
consist of two thousand eight hundred thirty-one recognized teachers
representing approximately one-fifth of all teachers serving grades
Req. No. 16075 Page 3

four th through eighth in Oklahoma. The Commission for Educational
Quality and Accountability shall establish criteria for the
selection of recognized teachers for the pilot program.
D. 1. The Office of Educational Quality and Accountability
shall place recognized teachers participating in the pilot program
into one of three tiers based on statewide student growth
percentiles from the Oklahoma State Testing Program and the
recognized teachers shall receive the annual performance bonus
associated with the tier:
a. Tier 1 (67th–79th percentile) – Above-Average Growth:
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) performance bonus,
b. Tier 2 (80th–94th percentile) – High Growth: Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) performance bonus, and
c. Tier 3 (95th percentile and above) – Exceptional
Growth: Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)
performance bonus.
2. The assignment to a tier shall be based solely on measurable
student academic growth, calculated using a rolling two-year period
of statewide assessment data. Provided that, during the first year
of the pilot program, tier assignment shall be calculated using a
single year of available growth data.
3. Performance bonuses shall be paid by the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability as supplemental compensation.
The performance bonus shall not be included in the calculation of
Req. No. 16075 Page 4

the teacher's salary for purposes of meeting the district or
statutory minimum salary schedule or for purposes of compensating
Oklahoma Teachers' Retirement System contributions or benefits. No
participating school shall be liable for payment of bonuses pursuant
to this section.
E. For each recognized teacher at a participating school, the
Office of Educational Quality and Accountability shall distribute a
schoolwide bonus of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to be
distributed equally among eligible early-grade teachers at that
school. The purpose of this distribution shall be to incentivize
vertical instructional alignment and early literacy and numeracy
development.
F. 1. The Office of Educational Quality and Accountability
shall contract with an independent evaluator to conduct a rigorous
evaluation of both:
a. program implementation fidelity, and
b. program effects on student achievement and teacher
workforce outcomes.
2. The evaluation shall include:
a. comparison groups,
b. longitudinal student growth analysis, and
c. workforce outcomes including retention and
recruitment.

Req. No. 16075 Page 5

G. 1. Beginning January 1, 2028, the Office shall annually
submit a report to:
a. the Governor,
b. the President Pro Tempore of the State Senate, and
c. the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives.
2. The report shall include:
a. number of recognized teachers and participating
schools,
b. growth distribution results,
c. compensation payments,
d. early-grade bonus distributions, and
e. findings from the independent evaluation.
H. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall promulgate rules to implement the Growth-Based Teacher
Compensation Program in accordance with this section.
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the Oklahoma Education Lottery Trust Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) or so much thereof as
may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Office of
Educational Quality and Accountability by law for the Growth-Based
Teacher Compensation Program.

Req. No. 16075 Page 6

SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16075 AQH 02/11/26


















Req. No. 16075 Page 7